Idaho, session 2025, H0186.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-4116, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-4116. INDECENT EXPOSURE. (1) Every A person is guilty of a misde-
meanor if the person who willfully and lewdly, either:
(1) (a) Exposes his or her genitals,; exposes developed female breasts,
including the areola and nipple; exposes adult male breasts, including
the areola and nipple, that have been medically or hormonally altered to
appear like developing or developed female breasts; exposes artificial
breasts, including the areola and nipple, intended to resemble female
breasts; or displays toys or products intended to resemble male or fe-
male genitals in any public place, or in any place where there is present
another person or persons who are offended or annoyed thereby; or
(2) (b) Procures, counsels, or assists any person so to expose his or
her genitals,; to expose developed female breasts, including the areola
and nipple; to expose adult male breasts, including the areola and nip-
ple, that have been medically or hormonally altered to appear like de-
veloping or developed female breasts; to expose artificial breasts, in-
cluding the areola and nipple, intended to resemble female breasts; or
to display toys or products intended to resemble male or female genitals
where there is present another person or persons who are offended or an-
noyed thereby is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(2) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation of
subsection (1) or (2) of this section or a similar statute in another state
or any local jurisdiction for a second third time within five (5) years,
notwithstanding the form of the judgment(s) or withheld judgment(s), is
guilty of a felony and shall may be imprisoned in the state prison for a pe-
riod not to exceed ten (10) five (5) years.
(3) The provisions of this section shall not apply to the breastfeed-
ing of a child or the expression of breast milk for the purpose of feeding a
child.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.